Washington statutes.
RCW 22.28.020

Safe deposit company a warehouse operator.

Whenever any safe deposit company shall take or receive as bailee for hire and for safekeeping or storage any jewelry, plate, money, specie, bullion, stocks, bonds, mortgages, securities, or valuable paper of any kind, or other valuable personal property, and shall have issued a receipt therefor, it shall be deemed to be a warehouse operator as to such property and the provisions of Article 7 of the Uniform Commercial Code, Title 62A RCW, shall apply to such deposit, or to the proceeds thereof, to the same extent and with the same effect, and be enforceable in the same manner as is now provided with reference to warehouse operators in said act.

[ 2011 c 336 s 650; 1983 c 3 s 26; 1923 c 186 s 2; RRS s 3383.]